Utah statutes.
11-10-2.   Qualifications of licensee.

(1)  A license may not be granted:

(a)  unless the licensee is of good moral character, over the age of 21 years, and a citizen of the United States;

(b)  to anyone who has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;

(c)  to any partnership or association, any member of which lacks any of the qualifications set out in this section; or

(d)  to any corporation, if any of its directors or officers lacks any qualification set out in this section.

(2)  The local authority shall, before issuing licenses, satisfy itself by written evidence executed by the applicant that the applicant meets the standards set forth.

